Maine, session 132, LD815.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES, DEPARTMENT OF
Office of Aging and Disability Services Central Office 0140
Initiative: Provides ongoing funding to the Office of Aging and Disability Services to
provide respite care and supplemental services for family caregivers and older relative
caregivers.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $100,000 $100,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $100,000 $100,000
Page 1 - 132LR1108(06)